Utah statutes.
19-6-121.   Local zoning authority powers.

Nothing in this part prohibits any local zoning authority from adopting zoning criteria for commercial hazardous waste disposal facilities or sites that are more stringent than any requirements adopted by the department.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 112, 1991 General Session

